Utah statutes.
70A-9a-204.    After-acquired property -- Future advances.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), a security agreement may
create or provide for a security interest in after-acquired collateral.
(2) A security interest does not attach under a term constituting an after-
acquired property clause to:
(a)  consumer goods, other than an accession when given as additional
security, unless the debtor acquires rights in them within ten days after the
secured party gives value; or
(b)  a commercial tort claim.
(3)  A security agreement may provide that collateral secures, or that
accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes are sold in
connection with, future advances or other value, whether or not the advances
or value are given pursuant to commitment.
